Utah statutes.
48-2c-806.   Reliance by member or manager on reports and information.
Unless a member or manager has knowledge concerning the matter in question
that makes reliance unwarranted, the member or manager shall be fully
protected in relying in good faith upon:
(1)  the records of the company; and
(2)  the information, opinions, reports, or statements presented to the
company by any of its other managers, members, employees or committees, or by
any other person, as to matters the member or manager reasonably believes are
within the other person's professional or expert competence, including, but
not limited to, information, opinions, reports, or statements as to the value
and amount of assets, liabilities, profits or losses of the company, or any
other facts pertinent to the existence and amount of assets from which
distributions to members might properly be paid.
